Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201844-9105
Corporate governance annual disclosure; contents; request for additional information.

The corporate governance annual disclosure shall be prepared in a manner prescribed by the director. The insurer or insurance group shall have discretion over the responses to the corporate governance annual disclosure inquiries, except that the corporate governance annual disclosure shall contain the material information necessary to permit the director to gain an understanding of the insurer's or insurance group's corporate governance structure, policies, and practices. The director may request additional information that he or she deems material and necessary to provide the director with a clear understanding of the corporate governance policies, reporting or information systems, or controls implementing the corporate governance policies. Documentation and supporting information shall be maintained and made available upon examination or upon request of the director.

Laws 2016, LB772, § 5.